src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.aff
SFX X 0 ишингиздамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишингизда-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишиними [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишинидир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишини-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишинидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишинимикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишини-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишигами [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишигадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишига-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишигадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишигамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишига-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишиданми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишидандир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишидан-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишидандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишиданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишидан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишидами [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишидадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишида-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишидадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишидамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ишида-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимними [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимнидир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимни-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимнидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимни-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимгами [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимгадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимга-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимгадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимгамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимга-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимданми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимдандир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимдан-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимдандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимдан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимдами [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимдадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимда-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимдадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимдамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимда-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимизними [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимизнидир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимизни-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимизнидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимизнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимизни-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимизгами [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимизгадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимизга-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимизгадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимизгамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимизга-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимизданми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимиздандир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимиздан-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимиздандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимизданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимиздан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимиздами [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимиздадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимизда-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимиздадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимиздамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигимизда-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингними [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингнидир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингни-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингнидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингни-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигинггами [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигинггадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингга-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигинггадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигинггамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингга-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингданми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингдандир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингдан-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингдандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингдан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингдами [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингдадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингда-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингдадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингдамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингда-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингизними [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингизнидир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингизни-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингизнидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингизнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингизни-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингизгами [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингизгадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингизга-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингизгадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингизгамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингизга-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингизданми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингиздандир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингиздан-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингиздандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингизданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингиздан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингиздами [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингиздадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингизда-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингиздадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингиздамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигингизда-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигиними [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигинидир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигини-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигинидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигинимикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигини-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигигами [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигигадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигига-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигигадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигигамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигига-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигиданми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигидандир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигидан-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигидандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигиданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигидан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигидами [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигидадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигида-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигидадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигидамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маслигида-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимни [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимними [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимнидир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимни-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимнидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимни-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимга [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимгами [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимгадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимга-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимгадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимгамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимга-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимдан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимданми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимдандир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимдан-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимдандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимдан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимда [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимдами [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимдадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимда-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимдадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимдамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимда-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизни [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизними [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизнидир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизни-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизнидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизни-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизга [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизгами [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизгадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизга-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизгадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизгамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизга-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимиздан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизданми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимиздандир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимиздан-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимиздандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимиздан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизда [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимиздами [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимиздадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизда-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимиздадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимиздамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларимизда-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларингни [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларингними [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларингнидир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларингни-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларингнидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларингнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларингни-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масликларингга [^аеёиоуўэюя]
