src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.dic
авансла/X
авторлаштир/X
адипла/X
ажрат/X
азотлаштир/X
айқириш/X
айрибошлан/X
акакла/X
акцентла/X
алахси/X
алифла/X
алмаштирил/X
англан/X
аниқлаш/X
аразлаш/X
арзонсин/X
артил/X
асбестла/X
асталаш/X
афгорлан/X
ачин/X
аяш/X
бадирлаш/X
байбайлаш/X
баланслаш/X
бардамлан/X
баслан/X
баҳолаш/X
бедорлантир/X
безаттирил/X
бекинтир/X
белгилаш/X
бердирт/X
бетарафлаштирил/X
бетонлаштирил/X
биғиллаш/X
биқилла/X
билдирил/X
билчилла/X
бирхиллаштирил/X
бичир/X
боғлаш/X
боққизил/X
бомбардимонла/X
босинқира/X
ботқиздир/X
бошлаттирил/X
бўғилиш/X
будурлан/X
бўзлан/X
бўйчанлаш/X
бўктарил/X
булғалан/X
бўлол/X
бурғилан/X
буркантир/X
бўрсилла/X
буташ/X
бўшан/X
буюртир/X
вадаванглаш/X
вайсаш/X
ванғилла/X
васиқала/X
видолаш/X
витвитла/X
волдира/X
газаклат/X
гангира/X
гапирил/X
гезариш/X
гижингла/X
грекчала/X
гувуллат/X
гумбазла/X
гупуртир/X
гуруҳлан/X
ғазаблан/X
ғарсилла/X
ғижирлат/X
ғимилла/X
ғирингла/X
ғовурлаш/X
ғужлан/X
ғўрилла/X
дағаллаштир/X
даккила/X
данғиллат/X
дармонсизлантир/X
даъволаш/X
декретлаштирил/X
деҳқонлаш/X
диккайтир/X
димоғлан/X
довдира/X
долзарблаштир/X
дўғовла/X
дўқанглат/X
дўмпайтир/X
дупурлаш/X
дутдутлат/X
егизавер/X
ёғсира/X
ёздириш/X
ёйин/X
ёқтирил/X
елимлат/X
елпиниш/X
ёнавер/X
ёндашил/X
ёпиштирил/X
ёрқинлаш/X
етил/X
ётқиз/X
ечин/X
жабдуқлам/X
жадалла/X
жамла/X
жароҳатла/X
жиддийлаш/X
жилвирла/X
жилолан/X
жингиллат/X
жиртилла/X
жонлан/X
жўжала/X
жўралаш/X
заифлан/X
зангла/X
зарҳалла/X
зерикиш/X
зинғирла/X
зичлантир/X
зорла/X
зўриқтир/X
идентификацияла/X
изла/X
ийлан/X
илаштир/X
илдирил/X
илиттир/X
имирсира/X
ингра/X
индир/X
инла/X
интернетлаштир/X
ирғи/X
иркилла/X
искат/X
истат/X
ифодалан/X
ичикиш/X
ишкалла/X
ишлатил/X
ишшайтир/X
йиғиш/X
йилтира/X
йиртиш/X
йўқлаттир/X
йўлла/X
йўрмалан/X
кайфлан/X
каловлат/X
камчиллаш/X
карнайлат/X
катталаштир/X
кездиртир/X
келиштир/X
кенгайтир/X
керттир/X
кетавериш/X
кечин/X
кийгиз/X
кинолаштир/X
кирла/X
кичиклаштир/X
клонла/X
кодификацияла/X
комиллаш/X
консервалан/X
косиблаш/X
кўвала/X
куйдир/X
кўканла/X
кукунлат/X
культивацияла/X
кўндалангла/X
кўпикла/X
кўраёз/X
кўришиш/X
кўсакла/X
куфла/X
кучсизлан/X
қаватла/X
қадоқла/X
қази/X
қайна/X
қайтала/X
қақра/X
қалбакилаштирил/X
қаматтир/X
қаноатлан/X
қарсиллат/X
қаттиқлан/X
қизғаниш/X
қийна/X
қилпанглат/X
қирқира/X
қистоқла/X
қовуштир/X
қолиш/X
қоплаттир/X
қошиқлаш/X
қўзғалиш/X
қулатил/X
қумалат/X
қўрғошинла/X
қуртла/X
қутур/X
лақиллат/X
лимитла/X
локлан/X
маддала/X
маккорлаш/X
мафкуралаштир/X
маъюслантирил/X
мижғиш/X
мингаштир/X
моғорлат/X
моторлаштир/X
музлатил/X
мўлтира/X
мутаассиблаш/X
найла/X
нафлан/X
ниқоблан/X
ноиложлан/X
нохушлан/X
обкашла/X
огоҳлан/X
оёқлаш/X
озиш/X
оқартир/X
олислаштир/X
омочлат/X
оролан/X
отқиз/X
очқа/X
пайпаслаш/X
пардозлаш/X
патентла/X
пизилла/X
пирсилла/X
пишилла/X
поклан/X
проекцияла/X
пухталан/X
рақамла/X
редукциялан/X
роҳатлантир/X
сайлан/X
санал/X
саралан/X
саҳифала/X
селпи/X
сертификатлан/X
сийған/X
сиқиштир/X
силташ/X
сипқир/X
системалан/X
соғин/X
солқилаш/X
стандартлаштирил/X
судралиш/X
суйкат/X
сўлинқира/X
сургал/X
сурла/X
суюн/X
таёқлаттир/X
такрорла/X
тақиш/X
тамғала/X
танлан/X
тараттир/X
тарсилла/X
татин/X
ташин/X
таъсирла/X
тежаш/X
темирлаш/X
теранлаш/X
тиғизлан/X
тийиш/X
тиқиш/X
тимирскилан/X
тинчсизлантир/X
тириш/X
тисартир/X
тоблантир/X
тоқила/X
топирлат/X
торттир/X
тугин/X
тузал/X
тўйғаздир/X
тўқинтир/X
тўлғиздир/X
тунаш/X
тўпорилаш/X
турмучлан/X
туташтир/X
тушир/X
увулла/X
узайтирил/X
ўзлаштирил/X
ўйилтир/X
укамла/X
ўқра/X
улиш/X
умумийлаштирил/X
ундайвер/X
ўралиш/X
ўринлаштирил/X
уруғла/X
ўтирол/X
ўтоқла/X
ўчириш/X
ушлат/X
фарқлан/X
хавотирлан/X
хасталантир/X
хипчинлан/X
холисла/X
хронограмма/X
хўтхўтла/X
ҳайдаш/X
ҳалпиллат/X
ҳаялла/X
ҳисоблаш/X
ҳужжатла/X
ҳуҳула/X
чайиш/X
чақирт/X
чалкаштир/X
чанқат/X
чарчатил/X
чекиш/X
чиғиллаш/X
чикилла/X
чимилла/X
чиркинлаш/X
чоғлаш/X
чувалтир/X
чўздир/X
чўққай/X
чўмилтир/X
чучуклаштир/X
шақиллат/X
шапалоқлат/X
шатирла/X
шиквалан/X
шимир/X
шитоблан/X
шодлантирил/X
шувал/X
эгаллаш/X
эзмалаш/X
эм/X
эплол/X
эслатиш/X
ювил/X
юқорила/X
юмшатил/X
ютқаздир/X
яқинлаш/X
ялпоқла/X
янчтир/X
ясан/X
яшир/X
